Tennessee, session 114, SB2075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-701(e)(1), is amended by
deleting "to the members of the general assembly" and substituting instead "to the members of
the general assembly and the directors of the office of legislative budget analysis".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2075
010171
- 1 -